Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB68.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.645 is amended to read as follows:
The General Assembly recognizes that public education involves shared responsibilities. State government, local
communities, parents, students, and school employees must work together to create an efficient public school system
to achieve excellence in education. Parents and students must assist schools with efforts to assure student attendance,
preparation for school, and involvement in learning. The cooperation of all involved is necessary to assure that
desired outcomes are achieved. It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a system of public education which
shall allow and assist all students to acquire the following capacities:
(1) Literacy, including communication skills necessary to function in a complex and changing world[civilization];
(2) Knowledge to make wise economic, social, career, and political choices;
(3) Core values and qualities of good character to make moral and ethical decisions throughout[ his or her] life;
(4) Understanding of our constitutional republic, the three (3) branches of government, and how government
impacts citizens,[governmental processes as they affect] the community, the state, and the nation;
(5) Sufficient self-knowledge and knowledge of the student's own[his] mental and physical wellness;
(6) Sufficient grounding in the arts to enable each student to appreciate the student's own[his or her] cultural and
historical heritage;
(7) Sufficient preparation to choose and pursue the student's[his] life's work intelligently; and
(8) Skills to enable each student[him] to compete competitively[favorably] with students in other states.
Section 2. KRS 158.6451 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly finds, declares, and establishes that:
(a) Schools shall expect a high level of academic achievement of all students;[.]
(b) Schools shall develop their students' ability to:
1. Use[ basic] communication and mathematics skills for purposes and situations they will
encounter throughout their lives;
2. Apply core concepts and principles from mathematics, the sciences, the arts, the humanities,
social studies, civics, and practical living studies to situations they will encounter throughout
their lives;
3. Become self-sufficient individuals of good character exhibiting the qualities of altruism,
citizenship, courtesy, hard work, honesty, human worth, justice, knowledge, patriotism, respect,
responsibility, and self-discipline;
4. Become responsible members of a family, work group, or community, including demonstrating
effectiveness in community service;
5. Think critically, creatively, and independently to[and] solve problems in school situations and in
a variety of situations they will encounter in life;
6. Connect and integrate experiences and new knowledge from all subject matter fields with what
they have previously learned and build on past learning experiences to acquire new information
through various media sources; and
7. Express their creative talents and interests in visual arts, music, dance, and dramatic arts;[.]
(c) Schools shall increase their students' rate of school attendance;[.]
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) Schools shall increase their students' graduation rates and reduce their students' dropout and retention
rates;[.]
(e) Schools shall reduce physical and mental health barriers to learning; and[.]
(f) Schools shall be measured on the proportion of students who make a successful transition to work, post-
secondary education, and [the ]military service.
(2) The Kentucky Board of Education shall disseminate to local school districts and schools a model curriculum
framework which is directly tied to the goals, outcomes, and assessment strategies developed pursuant to this
section and KRS 158.645 and 158.6453. The framework shall provide direction to local districts and schools
as they develop their curriculum. The framework shall identify teaching and assessment strategies,
instructional material resources, ideas on how to incorporate the resources of the community, a directory of
model teaching sites, alternative ways of using school time, and strategies to incorporate character education
throughout the curriculum.
Section 3. KRS 156.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner of education shall be the chief executive of the Department of Education. The
commissioner shall be responsible for administering, structuring, and organizing the department and its
services, including[,] but not limited to[,] the following:
(a) Technical assistance with curriculum design, school administration and finance, computer and
technology services, media services, community education, career and technical[secondary vocational]
education, STEM education as defined in KRS 158.845, education for exceptional children, and
professional development;
(b) Compensatory education;
(c) Research and planning, which shall include, but not be limited to, a statewide research and development
effort to identify or develop the best educational practices to be used in the public schools of the
Commonwealth. Appropriations for this purpose may be used within the department or for contracting
with other individuals, agencies, universities, laboratories, or organizations;
(d) Kentucky School for the Blind and the Kentucky School for the Deaf;
(e) Performance and outcome assessments;
(f) Monitoring the management of school districts, including administration and finance, implementation
of state laws and regulations, and student performance; and
(g) Implementing state laws and the policies promulgated thereunder by the Kentucky Board of Education
and the Education Professional Standards Board.
(2) The commissioner of education may delegate[ to his assistants] any authority to act on the commissioner's
behalf[for him] in the supervision, inspection, and administration of the schools to the extent the
commissioner[he] has supervisory and administrative control.
(3) All employees of the Department of Education shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling expenses incurred
in the performance of their official duties, and no part of the reimbursement shall be included in or accounted
as a part of their salaries.
(4) The State Department of Education, in the operation and management of its schools and the programs at these
schools, shall meet all required federal and state standards relating to facilities and personnel qualifications;
however, no license or license fee shall be required for any school or program operated by the State
Department of Education.
(5) The Department of Education shall be the sole state agency for the purpose of developing and approving state
plans required by state or federal laws and regulations as prerequisites to receiving federal funds for
elementary and secondary education.
Section 4. KRS 160.345 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Minority" means American Indian; Alaskan native; African-American; Hispanic, including persons of
Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, and Central or South American origin; Pacific islander; or other ethnic
group underrepresented in the school;

CHAPTER 86 3
(b) "School" means an elementary or secondary educational institution that is under the administrative
control of a principal and is not a program or part of another school. The term "school" does not include
district-operated schools that are:
1. Exclusively vocational-technical, special education, or preschool programs;
2. Instructional programs operated in institutions or schools outside of the district; or
3. Alternative schools designed to provide services to at-risk populations with unique needs;
(c) "Teacher" means any person for whom certification is required as a basis of employment in the public
schools of the state, with the exception of principals and assistant principals; and
(d) "Parent" means:
1. A parent, stepparent, or foster parent of a student; or
2. A person who has legal custody of a student pursuant to a court order and with whom the student
resides.
(2) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy for implementing school-based decision making in the
district which shall include but not be limited to a description of how the district's policies, including those
developed pursuant to KRS 160.340, have been amended to allow the professional staff members of a school
to be involved in the decision-making process as they work to meet educational goals established in KRS
158.645 and 158.6451. The policy may include a requirement that each school council make an annual report
at a public meeting of the board describing the school's progress in meeting the educational goals set forth in
KRS 158.6451 and district goals established by the board. The policy shall also address and comply with the
following:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)2. of this subsection, each participating school shall form a school
council composed of two (2) parents, three (3) teachers, and the principal or administrator. The
membership of the council may be increased, but it may only be increased proportionately. A parent
representative on the council shall not be an employee or a relative of an employee of the school in
which that parent serves, nor shall the parent representative be an employee or a relative of an employee
in the district administrative offices. A parent representative shall not be a local board member or a
board member's spouse. None of the members shall have a conflict of interest pursuant to KRS Chapter
45A, except the salary paid to district employees;
(b) 1. The teacher representatives shall be elected for one (1) year terms by a majority of the teachers.
A teacher elected to a school council shall not be involuntarily transferred during the teacher
representative's[his or her] term of office. The parent representatives shall be elected for one (1)
year terms. The parent members shall be elected by the parents of students preregistered to attend
the school during the term of office in an election conducted by the parent and teacher
organization of the school or, if none exists, the largest organization of parents formed for this
purpose. Council elections may allow voting to occur over multiple days and via electronic
means. A school council, once elected, may adopt a policy setting different terms of office for
parent and teacher members subsequently elected. The principal shall be the chair of the school
council.
2. School councils in schools having eight percent (8%) or more minority students enrolled, as
determined by the enrollment on the preceding October 1, shall have at least one (1) minority
member. If the council formed under paragraph (a) of this subsection does not have a minority
member, the principal, in a timely manner, shall be responsible for carrying out the following:
a. Organizing a special election to elect an additional member. The principal shall call for
nominations and shall notify the parents of the students of the date, time, and location of
the election to elect a minority parent to the council by ballot; and
b. Allowing the teachers in the building to select one (1) minority teacher to serve as a
teacher member on the council. If there are no minority teachers who are members of the
faculty, an additional teacher member shall be elected by a majority of all teachers. Term
limitations shall not apply for a minority teacher member who is the only minority on
faculty;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) 1. The school council shall have the responsibility to set school policy that shall be consistent with
district board policy and which shall provide an environment to enhance the students'
achievement and help the school meet the goals established by KRS 158.645 and 158.6451 and
goals for the district established by the board. The principal shall be the primary administrator
and the instructional leader of the school, and with the assistance of the total school staff shall
administer the policies established by the school council and the local board.
2. If a school council establishes committees, it shall adopt a policy to facilitate the participation of
interested persons, including, but not limited to, classified employees and parents. The policy
shall include the number of committees, their jurisdiction, composition, and the process for
membership selection;
(d) The school council and each of its committees shall determine the frequency of and agenda for their
meetings. Matters relating to formation of school councils that are not provided for by this section shall
be addressed by local board policy;
(e) The meetings of the school council shall be open to the public and all interested persons may attend.
However, the exceptions to open meetings provided in KRS 61.810 shall apply;
(f) After receiving notification of the funds available for the school from the local board, the school council
shall determine, within the parameters of the total available funds, the number of persons to be
employed in each job classification at the school. The council may make personnel decisions on
vacancies occurring after the school council is formed but shall not have the authority to recommend
transfers or dismissals;
(g) The local superintendent shall determine which curriculum, textbooks, instructional materials, and
student support services shall be provided in the school after consulting with the local board of
education, the school principal, and the school council and after a reasonable review and response
period for stakeholders in accordance with local board of education policy. Subject to available
resources, the local board shall allocate an appropriation to each school that is adequate to meet the
school's needs related to instructional materials and school-based student support services, as
determined by the school principal after consultation with the school council. The school council shall
consult with the school media librarian on the maintenance of the school library media center, including
the purchase of instructional materials, information technology, and equipment;
(h) Personnel decisions at the school level shall be as follows:
1. From a list of qualified applicants submitted by the local superintendent, the principal at the
participating school shall select personnel to fill vacancies, after consultation with the school
council, consistent with paragraph (i)11. of this subsection. The superintendent shall provide
additional applicants to the principal upon request when qualified applicants are available. The
superintendent may forward to the school principal the names of qualified applicants who have
pending certification from the Education Professional Standards Board based on recent
completion of preparation requirements, out-of-state preparation, or alternative routes to
certification pursuant to KRS 161.028 and 161.048. Requests for transfer shall conform to any
employer-employee bargained contract which is in effect;
2. If the vacancy to be filled is the position of principal:
a. The superintendent shall fill the vacancy after consultation with the school council
consistent with paragraph (i)11. of this subsection;
b. Prior to consultation with the school council, each member shall sign a nondisclosure
agreement forbidding the disclosure of information shared and discussions held during
consultation;
c. A person who believes a violation of the nondisclosure agreement referred to in
subdivision b. of this subparagraph has occurred may file a written complaint with the
Kentucky Board of Education; and
d. A school council member found to have violated the nondisclosure agreement referred to
in subdivision b. of this subparagraph may be subject to removal from the school council
by the Kentucky Board of Education under subsection (9)(e) of this section;

CHAPTER 86 5
3. Notwithstanding subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, if the vacancy to be filled is the position of
principal in a county school district in a county with a consolidated local government adopted
under KRS Chapter 67C, then:
a. The outgoing principal shall not serve on the council during the principal selection
process. The superintendent or the superintendent's designee shall serve as the chair of the
council for the purpose of the hiring process and shall have voting rights during the
selection process;
b. The council shall have access to the applications of all persons certified for the position.
The principal shall be elected on a majority vote of the membership of the council. The
school council shall receive training in recruitment and interviewing techniques prior to
carrying out the process of selecting a principal. The council shall select the trainer to
deliver the training; and
c. Notwithstanding the requirement that a principal be elected by a majority vote of the
council, the selection of a principal shall be subject to approval by the superintendent. If
the superintendent does not approve the principal selected by the council, then the
superintendent may select the principal;
4. No principal who has been previously removed from a position in the district for cause may be
considered for appointment as principal in that district;
5. Personnel decisions made at the school level under the authority of subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph shall be binding on the superintendent who completes the hiring process;
6. Applicants subsequently employed shall provide evidence that they are certified prior to
assuming the duties of a position in accordance with KRS 161.020; and
7. Notwithstanding other provisions of this paragraph, if the applicant is the spouse of the
superintendent and the applicant meets the service requirements of KRS 160.380(3)(a), the
applicant shall only be employed upon the recommendation of the principal and the approval of a
majority vote of the school council;
(i) The school council shall adopt a policy that shall be consistent with local board policy and shall be
implemented by the principal in the following additional areas:
1. Curriculum responsibilities under KRS 158.6453(19);
2. Assignment of all instructional and noninstructional staff time;
3. Assignment of students to classes and programs within the school;
4. Determination of the schedule of the school day and week, subject to the beginning and ending
times of the school day and school calendar year as established by the local board;
5. Determination of use of school space during the school day related to improving classroom
teaching and learning;
6. Planning and resolution of issues regarding instructional practices;
7. Selection and implementation of discipline and classroom management techniques as a part of a
comprehensive school safety plan, including responsibilities of the student, parent, teacher,
counselor, and principal;
8. Selection of extracurricular programs and determination of policies relating to student
participation based on academic qualifications and attendance requirements, program evaluation,
and supervision;
9. Adoption of an emergency plan as required in KRS 158.162;
10. Procedures, consistent with local school board policy, for determining alignment with state
standards, technology utilization, and program appraisal; and
11. Procedures to assist the council with consultation in the selection of the principal by the
superintendent, and the selection of personnel by the principal, including but not limited to
meetings, timelines, interviews, review of written applications, and review of references.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Procedures shall address situations in which members of the council are not available for
consultation; and
(j) Each school council shall annually review data as shown on state and local student assessments required
under KRS 158.6453. The data shall include but not be limited to information on performance levels of
all students tested, and information on the performance of students disaggregated by race, gender,
disability, and participation in the federal free and reduced price lunch program. After completing the
review of data, each school council, with the involvement of parents, faculty, and staff, shall develop
and adopt a plan to ensure that each student makes progress toward meeting the goals set forth in KRS
158.645 and 158.6451(1)(b) by April 1 of each year and submit the plan to the superintendent and local
board of education for review as described in KRS 160.340. The Kentucky Department of Education
shall provide each school council the data needed to complete the review required by this paragraph no
later than October 1 of each year. If a school does not have a council, the review shall be completed by
the principal with the involvement of parents, faculty, and staff.
(3) The policies adopted by the local board to implement school-based decision making shall also address the
following:
(a) School budget and administration, including: discretionary funds; activity and other school funds; funds
for maintenance, supplies, and equipment; and procedures for authorizing reimbursement for training
and other expenses;
(b) Assessment of individual student progress, including testing and reporting of student progress to
students, parents, the school district, the community, and the state;
(c) School improvement plans, including the form and function of strategic planning and its relationship to
district planning, as well as the school safety plan and requests for funding from the Center for School
Safety under KRS 158.446;
(d) Professional development plans developed pursuant to KRS 156.095;
(e) Parent, citizen, and community participation including the relationship of the council with other groups;
(f) Cooperation and collaboration within the district, with other districts, and with other public and private
agencies;
(g) Requirements for waiver of district policies;
(h) Requirements for record keeping by the school council; and
(i) A process for appealing a decision made by a school council.
(4) In addition to the authority granted to the school council in this section, the local board may grant to the school
council any other authority permitted by law. The board shall make available liability insurance coverage for
the protection of all members of the school council from liability arising in the course of pursuing their duties
as members of the council.
(5) All schools shall implement school-based decision making in accordance with this section and with the policy
adopted by the local board pursuant to this section. Upon favorable vote of a majority of the faculty at the
school and a majority of at least twenty-five (25) voting parents of students enrolled in the school, a school
meeting its goal as determined by the Department of Education pursuant to KRS 158.6455 may apply to the
Kentucky Board of Education for exemption from the requirement to implement school-based decision
making, and the state board shall grant the exemption. The voting by the parents on the matter of exemption
from implementing school-based decision making shall be in an election conducted by the parent and teacher
organization of the school or, if none exists, the largest organization of parents formed for this purpose.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a local school district shall not be required to implement
school-based decision making if the local school district contains only one (1) school.
(6) The Department of Education shall provide professional development activities to assist schools in
implementing school-based decision making. School council members elected for the first time shall complete
a minimum of six (6) clock hours of training in the process of school-based decision making, no later than
thirty (30) days after the beginning of the service year for which they are elected to serve. School council
members who have served on a school council at least one (1) year shall complete a minimum of three (3)
clock hours of training in the process of school-based decision making no later than one hundred twenty (120)
days after the beginning of the service year for which they are elected to serve. Experienced members may
participate in the training for new members to fulfill their training requirement. School council training

CHAPTER 86 7
required under this subsection shall be conducted by trainers endorsed by the Department of Education. By
November 1 of each year, the principal through the local superintendent shall forward to the Department of
Education the names and addresses of each council member and verify that the required training has been
completed. School council members elected to fill a vacancy shall complete the applicable training within
thirty (30) days of their election.
(7) A school that chooses to have school-based decision making but would like to be exempt from the
administrative structure set forth by this section may develop a model for implementing school-based decision
making, including but not limited to a description of the membership, organization, duties, and responsibilities
of a school council. The school shall submit the model through the local board of education to the
commissioner of education and the Kentucky Board of Education, which shall have final authority for
approval. The application for approval of the model shall show evidence that it has been developed by
representatives of the parents, students, certified personnel, and the administrators of the school and that two-
thirds (2/3) of the faculty have agreed to the model.
(8) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon recommendation of the commissioner of education, shall adopt by
administrative regulation a formula by which school district funds shall be allocated to each school council.
Included in the school council formula shall be an allocation for professional development that is at least sixty-
five percent (65%) of the district's per pupil state allocation for professional development for each student in
average daily attendance in the school. The school council shall plan professional development in compliance
with requirements specified in KRS 156.095, except as provided in KRS 158.649. School councils of small
schools shall be encouraged to work with other school councils to maximize professional development
opportunities.
(9) (a) No board member, superintendent of schools, district employee, or member of a school council shall
intentionally engage in a pattern of practice which is detrimental to the successful implementation of or
circumvents the intent of school-based decision making to allow the professional staff members of a
school and parents to be involved in the decision making process in working toward meeting the
educational goals established in KRS 158.645 and 158.6451 or to make decisions in areas of policy
assigned to a school council pursuant to paragraph (i) of subsection (2) of this section.
(b) An affected party who believes a violation of this subsection has occurred may file a written complaint
with the Office of Education Accountability. The office shall investigate the complaint and resolve the
conflict, if possible, or forward the matter to the Kentucky Board of Education.
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall conduct a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B for
complaints referred by the Office of Education Accountability.
(d) If the state board determines a violation has occurred, the party shall be subject to reprimand. A second
violation of this subsection may be grounds for removing a superintendent or a member of a school
council from office or grounds for dismissal of an employee for misconduct in office or willful neglect
of duty.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (d) of this subsection and KRS 7.410(2)(c), if the state board determines a
violation of the nondisclosure agreement required by subsection (2)(h)2.b. of this section by a school
council member has occurred, the state board shall remove the member from the school council, and the
member shall be permanently prohibited from serving on any school council in the district.
(10) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (9) of this section, a school's right to establish or maintain a school-based
decision making council and the powers, duties, and authority granted to a school council may be rescinded or
the school council's role may be advisory if the commissioner of education or the Kentucky Board of
Education takes action under KRS 160.346.
(11) Each school council of a school containing grades K-5 or any combination thereof, or if there is no school
council, the principal, shall develop and implement a wellness policy that includes moderate to vigorous
physical activity each day and encourages healthy choices among students. The policy may permit physical
activity to be considered part of the instructional day, not to exceed thirty (30) minutes per day, or one hundred
and fifty (150) minutes per week. Each school council, or if there is no school council, the principal, shall
adopt an assessment tool to determine each child's level of physical activity on an annual basis. The council or
principal may utilize an existing assessment program. The Kentucky Department of Education shall make
available a list of available resources to carry out the provisions of this subsection. The department shall report
to the Legislative Research Commission no later than November 1 of each year on how the schools are
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
providing physical activity under this subsection and on the types of physical activity being provided. The
policy developed by the school council or principal shall comply with provisions required by federal law, state
law, or local board policy.
Section 5. KRS 157.065 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any school that does not offer a school breakfast program shall submit an annual report no later than
September 15 to the Kentucky Board of Education indicating the reasons for not offering the program. The
report shall include the number of children enrolled at the school and the number of children who are eligible
for free or reduced priced meals under the federal program.
(2) The state board shall inform the school of the value of the school breakfast program, its favorable effects on
student attendance and performance, and the availability of funds to implement the program.[
(3) The commissioner of education shall submit an annual report no later than December 1 to the Interim Joint
Committee on Education regarding the status of the school breakfast program including, but not limited to,
information describing the schools that do not offer the program, the reasons given by the schools for not
offering the program, the number of children enrolled in each school, the number of children in each school
who are eligible for free or reduced priced meals under the federal program, and the action taken by the state
board to encourage schools to implement the program.]
Section 6. KRS 424.250 is amended to read as follows:
At the same time that copies of the budget of a school district are filed with the clerk of the tax levying authority for
the district, as provided in KRS 160.470, the board of education of the district shall cause the budget to be advertised
for the district by publishing a copy of the budget in a newspaper and on the district's website.
Section 7. KRS 158.4414 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Local boards of education, school district superintendents, administrators of state-controlled facilities, and
local and state law enforcement agencies shall cooperate to assign one (1) or more certified school resource
officers to serve each campus where one (1) or more school buildings are used to deliver instruction to
students on a continuous basis.
(2) Local boards of education shall ensure, for each campus in the district, that at least one (1) certified school
resource officer is assigned to and working on-site full-time in the school building or buildings on the campus.
If sufficient funds and qualified personnel are not available for this purpose for every campus, the local board
of education shall fulfill the requirements of this subsection on a per campus basis, as approved in writing by
the state school security marshal, until a certified school resource officer is assigned to and working on-site
full-time on each campus in the district.
(3) Beginning with the 2026-2027[2025-2026] school year, a local board of education that is unable to meet the
requirement of subsection (2) of this section may, after consultation with and approval by the state school
security marshal, employ one (1) or more guardians pursuant to KRS 158.4431 to provide safety and security
measures for schools within the district. The use of guardians under this subsection shall not be used to replace
the certified school resource officer required under subsection (2) of this section, but only to provide safety
and security resources until a certified school resource officer is available.
(4) Beginning with the 2026-2027[2025-2026] school year, a local board of education that has met the
requirement of subsection (2) of this section may employ one (1) or more guardians pursuant to KRS 158.4431
to provide additional school safety and security measures within the district.
(5) Local boards of education utilizing a school resource officer employed by a law enforcement agency or the
Department of Kentucky State Police shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the law
enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police that specifically states the purpose of the
school resource officer program and clearly defines the roles and expectations of each party involved in the
program. The memorandum shall provide that the school resource officer shall not be responsible for school
discipline matters that are the responsibility of school administrators or school employees.
(6) Local boards of education utilizing a school resource officer employed directly by the local board of education
shall adopt policies and procedures that specifically state the purpose of the school resource officer program
and clearly define the roles and expectations of school resource officers and other school employees.
(7) In accordance with KRS 61.926, 527.020, and 527.070, as applicable, each school resource officer shall be
armed with a firearm, notwithstanding any provision of local board policy, local school council policy, or
memorandum of agreement.

CHAPTER 86 9
(8) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, in collaboration with the Center for School Safety, shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish, update, and maintain three (3)
levels of training for certification of school resource officers as follows: School Resource Officer Training I
(SRO I), School Resource Officer Training II (SRO II), and School Resource Officer Training III (SRO III).
Each level shall consist of forty (40) hours of training, with SRO I to be completed within one (1) year of the
date of the officer's employment and SRO II and SRO III within the subsequent two (2) years.
(9) Course curriculum for school resource officers shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Foundations of school-based law enforcement;
(b) Threat assessment and response;
(c) Youth drug use and abuse;
(d) Social media and cyber security;
(e) School resource officers as teachers and mentors;
(f) Youth mental health awareness;
(g) Diversity and bias awareness training;
(h) Trauma-informed action;
(i) Understanding students with special needs; and
(j) De-escalation strategies.
(10) All school resource officers with active school resource officer certification status shall successfully complete
forty (40) hours of annual in-service training that has been certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council for school resource officers.
(11) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that prevent the officer from
completing the in-service training within one (1) year, the commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice
Training or a designee may grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180)
days, in which to complete the training.
(12) Any school resource officer who fails to successfully complete training requirements within the specified time
periods, including any approved time extensions, shall lose his or her school resource officer certification and
shall no longer serve in the capacity of a school resource officer in a school.
(13) When a school resource officer is deficient in required training, the commissioner of the Department of
Criminal Justice Training or his or her designee shall notify the council, which shall notify the officer and the
officer's employing agency.
(14) A school resource officer who has lost school resource officer certification due solely to the officer's failure to
meet the training requirements of this section may regain certification status as a school resource officer and
may resume service in the capacity of a school resource officer in a school setting upon successful completion
of the training deficiency.
(15) No later than November 1 of each year, the local school district superintendent shall report to the Center for
School Safety the number and placement of school resource officers in the district. The report shall include the
source of funding and method of employment for each position.
(16) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed to require a local government or any of its agencies or
offices to fund the school resource officer positions required of local boards of education under this section.
For purposes of this subsection, "local government" has the same meaning as in KRS 65.8840.
(17) Nothing in this section shall prevent a private or parochial school from entering into a memorandum of
understanding with a local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police to provide
school resource officers employed by the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State
Police.
Section 8. The following KRS sections are repealed:
157.061 Annual audits of school districts.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
158.856 Annual assessment and evaluation of school nutrition in district -- Special board meeting and public forum
to discuss nutrition and physical activity in the schools -- School district to prepare and submit findings and
recommendations to Board of Education.
Signed by Governor March 25, 2025.